Yamls/N-kar_gt-norm.yaml
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [каррескӧт, каррезыскӧт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [каррестӧг, каррезыстӧг, каррезтӧгьяс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [карресла, каррезысла]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [карресся, каррезысся]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: каррезас
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [каррезсис, карресис]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: каррезас
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [карреслань, каррезыслань, каррезланяс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [каррессянь, каррезыссянь, каррезсяняс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [каррезӧттяс, каррезӧттис]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [каррезӧдззас, каррезӧдззис]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: карресви
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: каррезланяс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: каррезланьсис
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: каррезланяс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [каррезланьсяняс, карресланьсянь, каррезысланьсянь]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [каррезланьӧттяс, каррезланьӧттис, карресланьӧт, каррезысланьӧт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [каррезланьӧдззаc, каррезланьӧдззиc, карресланьӧдз, каррезысланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: карресланьви
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: каррезным
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: каррезнымлӧн
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: каррезнымлісь
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: каррезнымлӧ
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: каррезнымӧс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: каррезнаным
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxPl1: каррезнымкӧт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [каррезнымтӧг, каррезтӧгьяным]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: каррезнымла
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: каррезнымся
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: каррезаным
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [каррезсиным, карресиным]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: каррезаным
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [каррезнымлань, каррезланяным]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [каррезнымсянь, каррезсяняным]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [каррезӧттяным, каррезӧттиным]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [каррезӧдззаным, каррезӧдззиным]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: каррезнымви
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: каррезланяным
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: каррезланьсиным
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: каррезланяным
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [каррезланьсяняным, каррезнымланьсянь]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [каррезланьӧттяным, каррезланьӧттиным, каррезнымланьӧт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [каррезланьӧдззаным, каррезланьӧдззиным, каррезнымланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: каррезнымланьви
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: каррезныт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: каррезнытлӧн
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: каррезнытлісь
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: каррезнытлӧ
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: каррезнытӧ
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: каррезнаныт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxPl2: каррезныткӧт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [каррезныттӧг, каррезтӧгьяныт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: каррезнытла
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: каррезнытся
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: каррезаныт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [каррезсиныт, карресиныт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: каррезаныт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [каррезнытлань, каррезланяныт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [каррезнытсянь, каррезсяняныт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [каррезӧттяныт, каррезӧттиныт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [каррезӧдззаныт, каррезӧдззиныт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: каррезнытви
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: каррезланяныт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: каррезланьсиныт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: каррезланяныт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [каррезланьсяняныт, каррезнытланьсянь]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [каррезланьӧттяныт, каррезланьӧттиныт, каррезнытланьӧт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [каррезланьӧдззаныт, каррезланьӧдззиныт, каррезнытланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: каррезнытланьви
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: каррезныс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: каррезныслӧн
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: каррезныслісь
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: каррезныслӧ
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: каррезнысӧ
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: каррезнаныс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxPl3: каррезныскӧт
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [каррезныстӧг, каррезтӧгьяныс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: каррезнысла
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: каррезнысся
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: каррезаныс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [каррезсиныс, карресиныс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: каррезаныс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [каррезныслань, каррезланяныс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [каррезныссянь, каррезсяняныс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [каррезӧттяныс, каррезӧттиныс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [каррезӧдззаныс, каррезӧдззиныс]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: каррезнысви
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: каррезланяныс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: каррезланьсиныс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: каррезланяныс
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [каррезланьсяняныс, каррезнысланьсянь]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [каррезланьӧттяныс, каррезланьӧттиныс, каррезнысланьӧт]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [каррезланьӧдззаныс, каррезланьӧдззиныс, каррезнысланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: каррезнысланьви
